Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 25
COLORADO BEE ACT

Section

35-25-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Bee Act".

Source:

L. 73:

p. 203, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1593, § 1, effective April 3.

35-25-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advisory committee" means that committee appointed by the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of section 35-25-104.

(1.5) Repealed.

"Apiary" or "beeyard" means a hive or hives of bees in close proximity to one another.

(2.5) Repealed.

"Beekeeper" means any person producing or causing to be produced bees or bee products.

"Bees" means honey-producing insects of the genus apis, including all life stages.

"Beeswax" means the wax produced by the honeybee.

Repealed.

"Brood" means bees in any stage of development preceding emergence as adults.

"Certificate of inspection" means a document issued by the commissioner indicating the health conditions of the colony or apiary.

"Colony" means one group of bees established in a place acceptable to said bees for the rearing of young and the storage of honey.

"Comb" means any structure acceptable to bees for the storage of honey and pollen and the rearing of brood.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Contagious disease" means any disease produced by disease agents or parasitic agents to bees or beekeepers which shall be determined by the commissioner as being hazardous to the beekeeping industry in this state.

"Entry permit" means a document issued by the commissioner permitting entry of bees, equipment, or appliances into the state of Colorado, accompanied by a health certificate from the originating state indicating the number of colonies and county of destination.

"Equipment" means any object that is attached to or made a part of a hive.

"Frame" means any device designed to receive single sheets of wax foundation and in which bees are encouraged to draw comb.

"Hive" means any structure containing bees and designed to receive movable frames of comb.

(16.5) to (18) Repealed.

(19) "Person" means any body politic, individual, partnership, association, corporation, company, joint stock association, or organized group of persons whether incorporated or not and includes any trustee, receiver, or assignee. "Body politic" means any agency of this state or of the federal government or any unit of local government including any county, city, town, school district, local improvement or service district, special district, or other governmental unit having authority under the law to tax or impose assessments, including special assessments.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 203, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-2.

L. 75:

(17) R&RE and (20) and (21) added, p. 1347, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 83:

(16.5) added, p. 1359, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 85:

(16.5) repealed, p. 1140, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 90:

(1.5), (2.5), (6), (17), and (18) repealed and (12) and (19) amended, pp. 1597, 1593, §§ 13, 2, effective April 3.

35-25-102.5. Licensing functions subject to periodic review. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1612, § 8, effective June 7.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 933, § 28, effective April 28.

L. 90:

Entire section repealed, p. 1597, § 13, effective April 3.

35-25-103. Enforcement.

The commissioner or his authorized agents are authorized and directed to enforce the provisions of this article.

If it appears to the commissioner after examination of the facts that a violation of any provision of this article has occurred, he may refer the facts to the district attorney for the county in which the violation occurred.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring the commissioner to report for prosecution minor violations of this article or rules and regulations when the commissioner believes that the public interest will best be served by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

Each district attorney to whom any such violation is reported shall cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in any competent court without delay.

The commissioner may, by publication in such manner as he may prescribe, give notice of all judgments entered in actions instituted under the authority of this article.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any regulation made pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner. The maximum penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation.

No civil penalty may be imposed unless the person being charged has been given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Whenever the commissioner is found to have lacked substantial justification to impose a civil penalty, the person charged may recover his costs and attorney fees from the department of agriculture.

Moneys collected from any civil penalties under the provisions of this section shall be paid to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the bee inspection fund.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the ability of the person charged to stay in business.

The commissioner shall have full authority to administer oaths and take statements, to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before him and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 204, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-3.

L. 90:

(2) amended and (5) and (6) added, p. 1593, § 3, effective April 3.

35-25-104. Advisory committee and districts.

There is hereby created an advisory committee to be nominated by the beekeeping industry and composed of seven members to be appointed by the commissioner. The members shall meet with and advise the commissioner concerning the needs of the beekeeping industry and shall assist in formulating rules and regulations pertaining to the administration of this article. The members shall be as follows:

A beekeeper from the area of the Colorado river drainage basin, to be known as district 1;

A beekeeper from the area of the Rio Grande river drainage basin and all of Chaffee county, to be known as district 2;

A beekeeper from the area of the Arkansas river drainage basin, except Chaffee county, to be known as district 3;

A beekeeper from the area of the Platte and Republican rivers drainage basin, to be known as district 4;

The president of the Colorado beekeepers association;

The extension entomologist;

One member who is a beekeeper at large.

Members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 205, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-4.

L. 86:

(3) added, p. 425, § 59, effective March 26.

L. 90:

(1)(g) and (2) amended and (3) repealed, pp. 1594, 1597, §§ 4, 13, effective April 3.

35-25-105. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., for the administration of this article.

The powers and duties of the commissioner under this article may be delegated by the commissioner to employees of the department of agriculture designated by him.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 205, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-5.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1595, § 5, effective April 3.

35-25-106. Examination of apiaries.

The commissioner, when he has reason to suspect disease in any apiary, may examine all reported or suspected apiaries. If any contagious disease is present, he may examine all apiaries in the same locality and ascertain whether or not any contagious disease exists in the apiaries. If satisfied of the existence of any such contagious disease, the commissioner may burn, sterilize, or medically treat said apiary in strict compliance with rules and regulations pertaining thereto, or the commissioner may require the beekeeper to burn, sterilize, or medically treat said apiary.

If a dispute arises as to the diagnosis of the disease, a sample shall be taken and mailed to the nearest bee disease and investigation laboratory for positive identification. Should the occasion arise, the commissioner may preserve from destruction diseased colonies for experimental purposes.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 205, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-6.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1595, § 6, effective April 3.

35-25-107. Inspection of beehives for interstate movement.

Any beekeeper or person requesting an inspection of beehives for contagious disease for the purpose of interstate movement shall be liable for all costs of such inspection. The beekeeper or his agent shall accompany and assist the inspector in making the inspection.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 205, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-7.

L. 81:

IP(1) amended, p. 1704, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 83:

(1) and (4) amended and (1.1) and (1.3) added, p. 1359, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 85:

(1) R&RE and (1.1) repealed, pp. 1139, 1140, §§ 2, 4, effective May 31.

L. 90:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1595, § 7, effective April 3.

35-25-108. Beehives equipped with movable combs - certificate - permit.

Beehives shall be equipped with movable combs.

Bees on combs and used beekeeping appliances or equipment entering Colorado must be accompanied by a certificate declaring the apiaries from which the bees, appliances, or equipment originated to be free from contagious diseases. This certificate shall be from a duly authorized inspector of the state of origin.

Anyone desiring to move bees on combs or used bee equipment into the state of Colorado shall be required to secure an entry permit from the commissioner. Application for this permit shall be accompanied by a timely certificate of inspection, as defined by the commissioner, issued from the state apiary inspection agency of the state of origin, showing freedom from contagious disease, the number of colonies to be moved, and the county to which the owner or operator desires to move. The owner or operator of the bees or equipment shall notify the commissioner upon arrival in the state.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 206, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-8.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1595, § 8, effective April 3.

35-25-109. Labeling of adulterated or artificial products - enforcement. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

p. 206, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-9.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1347, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 77:

(3) added, p. 1602, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section repealed, p. 1597, § 13, effective April 3.

35-25-110. Authority to enter premises.

The commissioner is authorized, during reasonable business hours, to enter upon or into any premises, lands, buildings, or places where bees or beekeeping appliances are kept for carrying out the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 207, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-10.

35-25-111. Penalties.

In addition to civil penalties that may be imposed pursuant to section 35-25-103 (5), any person violating any provision of this article 25 commits a civil infraction and, for any offense thereafter, is guilty of a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 207, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-11.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1348, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1596, § 9, effective April 3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1548, § 309, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3278, § 623, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-25-112. Injunctive relief.

The commissioner may institute an action to enjoin any violation of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated under this article. A violation of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto is declared to constitute a public nuisance. Such action for injunction may be maintained notwithstanding the existence of other legal remedies and notwithstanding the pendency or successful completion of a criminal prosecution. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 207, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-12.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1596, § 10, effective April 3.

Cross references:

For abatement of a public nuisance, see part 3 of article 13 of title 16.

35-25-113. Agreements.

The commissioner may enter into agreements with any municipal, county, federal, or other state agencies and delegate authority to representatives thereof when such agencies or representatives may assist in carrying out the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 207, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-7-13.

35-25-114. Exemption. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1602, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 692, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1704, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1360, § 3, effective June 1.

35-25-115. Alfalfa leaf-cutter bees - importation - possession - enforcement - penalties. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 691, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 81:

(6) amended, p. 1706, § 1, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1984. (See L. 81, p. 1706.)

35-25-116. Bee inspection fund - transfer of moneys to plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

All fees collected pursuant to this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3. Within sixty days after July 1, 2009, the unexpended and unencumbered balance of the bee inspection fund, as that fund existed prior to July 1, 2009, shall be transferred to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1140, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1221, § 33, effective May 30.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1596, § 11, effective April 3.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 318, § 11, effective July 1.

35-25-117. Emergency powers.

If, at any time, the commissioner determines the existence of any imminent hazard inimical to the beekeeping industry in this state, the commissioner may take appropriate action, including but not limited to: Inspecting any public or private place; establishing and enforcing quarantines; issuing and enforcing orders and rules for the control and eradication of said hazard; and taking such other action as may seem advisable and not contrary to law as the commissioner is empowered with pursuant to this title. The commissioner is hereby authorized to seek reimbursement from the general assembly for any funds expended in the exercise of these emergency powers.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1596, § 12, effective April 3.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 879, § 10, effective August 7.